Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.140

Unlawfully marking article made of gold.

Every person who shall make, sell, offer to sell or dispose of, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article constructed wholly or in part of gold, or of an alloy of gold, and marked, stamped or branded in such manner as to indicate that the gold or alloy of gold in such article is of a greater degree or carat of fineness, by more than one carat, than the actual carat or fineness of such gold or alloy of gold, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 294; 1909 c 249 s 432; RRS s 2684.]